Nebraska, session 109, LB675.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB675 LB675
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 72-212, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
72-212 (1) No lands now owned or hereafter acquired by the state for
educational purposes shall be sold except at public auction.
(2) If any school lands listed to be sold pursuant sections 72-208,
72-257, 72-257.01, or 72-258 are within the boundaries of an Indian
reservation, the Indian tribe with jurisdiction over the Indian
reservation lands shall have the first right of refusal for purchase from
the Board of Educational Lands and Funds.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Indian reservation has the same meaning as in section 81-2509;
and
(b) Indian tribe has the same meaning as in section 43-1503.
Sec. 2. Section 72-232, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
72-232 (1) The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall have
authority to adopt such rules and regulations as it shall deem necessary
in the leasing of school lands and to prescribe such terms and conditions
of the lease, not inconsistent with sections 72-205, 72-232 to 72-235,
72-240.02 to 72-240.05, and 72-242, as it shall deem necessary to protect
the interests of the state. The board shall adopt and enforce a soil
conservation program. Failure of the lessee to utilize the land for the
purpose for which the land was leased or to observe and carry out soil
conservation requirements as provided in the rules and regulations of the
board shall be cause for cancellation of the lease.
(2) If any school lands available to be leased pursuant to sections
72-232 to 72-239 that are within the boundaries of an Indian reservation,
the Indian tribe with jurisdiction over the Indian reservation lands
shall have the first right-of-refusal for lease from the Board of
Educational Lands and Funds.
(3) For purposes of this section:
-2-

LB675 LB675
2025 2025
(a) Indian reservation has the same meaning as in section 81-2509;
and
(b) Indian tribe has the same meaning as in section 43-1503.
Sec. 3. Section 72-253, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
72-253 (1) The Board of Educational Lands and Funds is authorized
and empowered to enter into agreements with the officers and agents of
the United States Government for the exchange of any state educational
lands lying within any federal forest or game reserve within this state
for other lands of equal areas and value belonging to the United States.
The board is authorized to convey any such lands to the United States by
deed as provided in section 72-208, upon the execution by the United
States Government of a patent to the State of Nebraska for the United
States lands so exchanged.
(2) The Board of Educational Lands and Funds is authorized, upon the
written approval of the Governor, to enter into agreements with
individuals for the exchange of any state educational lands for other
lands of equal areas or value. Before such an exchange shall be made, it
shall be shown that the Board of Educational Lands and Funds will likely
be benefited by the exchange.
(3) The Board of Educational Lands and Funds is authorized, upon the
written approval of the Governor, to enter into agreements with an Indian
tribe for the sale or exchange of any state educational lands for other
lands of equal area or value. If the state educational lands to be sold
or exchanged are within the boundaries of an Indian reservation, prior to
such sale or exchange, the Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall
determine that the sale or exchange is not detrimental to any interest of
the state.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Indian reservation has the same meaning as in section 81-2509;
and
-3-

LB675 LB675
2025 2025
(b) Indian tribe has the same meaning as in section 43-1503.
Sec. 4. Original sections 72-212 and 72-253, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 72-232, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-4-